en: Banner message type: Blank (write-in); Customizable (seller-printed); Letter kit (arrangeable letters); No text/graphic only; Pre-printed message; Other
sv: Typ av meddelande på banderollen: Blank (skriv själv); Anpassningsbar (tryckt av säljare); Bokstavskit (flyttbara bokstäver); Ingen text/endast grafik; Förtryckt meddelande; Övrigt
zh-TW: 橫幅訊息類型: 空白 (可填寫); 可自訂 (賣家列印); 字母套件 (可排列字母); 無文字/僅有圖案; 預先印製訊息; 其他
zh-CN: 旗帜消息类型: 空白（手写）; 可定制（卖家打印）; 字母套件（可排列字母）; 无文字/仅图形; 预印信息; 其他
fi: Banderollin viestityyppi: Tyhjä (kirjoitettava); Mukautettava (myyjän tulostama); Kirjainpakkaus (järjestettävät kirjaimet); Ei tekstiä / vain kuva; Valmiiksi painettu viesti; Muu
ko: 배너 메시지 유형: 공백(직접 입력); 사용자 지정 가능(판매자 인쇄); 레터 키트(배치 가능한 글자); 텍스트 없음/그래픽만; 사전 인쇄된 메시지; 기타
pt-BR: Tipo de mensagem do banner: Em branco (para escrever); Personalizável (impresso pelo vendedor); Kit de letras (letras organizáveis); Sem texto/apenas gráfico; Mensagem pré-impressa; Outros
el: Τύπος μηνύματος banner: Κενό (συμπλήρωση); Προσαρμόσιμο (εκτυπώνεται από τον πωλητή); Κιτ γραμμάτων (γράμματα που διατάσσονται); Χωρίς κείμενο / μόνο γραφικά; Προεκτυπωμένο μήνυμα; Άλλο
ro-RO: Tipul mesajului banner: Necompletat (de scris pe el); Personalizabil (imprimat de vânzător); Set de litere (litere ce pot fi aranjate); Fără text/doar imagini grafice; Mesaj preimprimat; Altele
pl: Typ komunikatu na banerze: Pusty (do wpisania); Personalizowany (drukuje sprzedawca); Zestaw liter (do układania); Bez tekstu/tylko grafika; Wydrukowana wiadomość; Inne
fr: Type de message de la bannière: Vierge (à remplir); Personnalisable (imprimé par le vendeur); Kit de lettres (lettres modulables); Sans texte/graphique uniquement; Message préimprimé; Autre
it: Tipo di messaggio banner: Vuoto (da scrivere); Personalizzabile (stampato dal venditore); Kit di lettere (componibili); Nessun testo/Solo grafica; Messaggio prestampato; Altro
pt-PT: Tipo de mensagem do banner: Em branco (para escrever); Personalizável (impresso pelo vendedor); Kit de letras (letras organizáveis); Sem texto/apenas gráficos; Mensagem pré-impressa; Outro
ja: バナーメッセージタイプ: 無地 (書き込み式); カスタマイズ可能 (販売者印刷); レターキット (文字入れ替え可能); テキストなし/グラフィックのみ; 印刷済みメッセージ; その他
cs: Typ textu na banneru: Prázdné (k dopsání); Přizpůsobitelné (tiskne prodejce); Sada písmen (sestavitelná); Bez textu / pouze grafika; Předtištěný text; Jiné
th: ประเภทข้อความแบนเนอร์: ว่าง (เขียนเอง); ปรับแต่งได้ (ผู้ขายพิมพ์ให้); ชุดตัวอักษร (จัดเรียงได้); ไม่มีข้อความ/กราฟิกอย่างเดียว; พิมพ์ข้อความสำเร็จรูป; อื่นๆ
bg-BG: Тип банерно съобщение: Празен (за писане); Персонализиран (отпечатан от продавача); Комплект букви (подреждащи се букви); Без текст/само графика; Предварително отпечатано съобщение; Друго
sk-SK: Typ bannerovej správy: Prázdne (na vpísanie); Prispôsobiteľné (vytlačené predajcom); Súprava písmen (usporiadateľné písmená); Bez textu/iba grafika; Predtlačená správa; Iné
de: Typ der Bannernachricht: Leer (zum Beschriften); Anpassbar (vom Verkäufer gedruckt); Buchstaben-Set (variable Buchstaben); Kein Text/Nur Grafik; Vorgedruckte Nachricht; Sonstige
sl-SI: Vrsta sporočila na transparentu: Prazno (za vpis); Prilagodljivo (natisne prodajalec); Komplet črk (sestavljive črke); Brez besedila/samo grafika; Vnaprej natisnjeno sporočilo; Drugo
nb: Type bannermelding: Blank (skriv selv); Tilpassbar (trykket av selger); Bokstavsett (flyttbare bokstaver); Ingen tekst / bare grafikk; Forhåndstrykt melding; Annet
es: Tipo de mensaje de la pancarta: En blanco (para rellenar); Personalizable (impreso por el vendedor); Kit de letras (letras organizables); Sin texto/solo gráficos; Mensaje preimpreso; Otro
hr-HR: Vrsta poruke na zastavicama: Prazno (za upisivanje); Prilagodljivo (ispisuje prodavač); Komplet slova (slova za slaganje); Bez teksta / samo grafika; Unaprijed ispisana poruka; Ostalo
hu: Banneren megjelenő üzenet típusa: Üres (írható); Személyre szabható (eladó által nyomtatva); Betűkészlet (átrendezhető betűkkel); Nincs szöveg/csak grafika; Előre nyomtatott üzenet; Egyéb
nl: Banner berichttype: Blanco (om in te schrijven); Aanpasbaar (gedrukt door verkoper); Letterkit (verplaatsbare letters); Geen tekst/alleen afbeelding; Voorgedrukte tekst; Overig
tr: Afiş mesaj tipi: Boş (elle yazılan); Özelleştirilebilir (satıcı tarafından basılmış); Harf kiti (düzenlenebilir harfler); Metin yok/yalnızca grafik; Önceden basılmış mesaj; Diğer
lt-LT: Reklamjuostės pranešimo tipas: Tuščias (įrašoma); Pritaikomas (atspausdina pardavėjas); Raidžių rinkinys (dėliojamos raidės); Be teksto / tik grafika; Iš anksto atspausdintas tekstas; Kita
vi: Loại thông điệp trên biểu ngữ: Trống (tự viết); Có thể tùy chỉnh (người bán in); Bộ chữ cái (chữ cái có thể sắp xếp); Không có văn bản/chỉ có đồ họa; Thông điệp in sẵn; Khác
da: Bannerbeskedtype: Tom (til at skrive på); Kan tilpasses (udskrevet af forhandler); Bogstavsæt (bogstaver, der kan arrangeres); Ingen tekst/kun grafik; Forudtrykt besked; Andet
ru: Тип надписи на баннере: Пустой (для надписи); Настраиваемый (печать продавца); Набор букв (составляемые буквы); Без текста / только графика; Готовая надпись; Другое